dict-sa-Latn/sa-Latn.aff
# Sanskrit Dictionary in Hunspell format
# generated by ShreeDevi Kumar
# on Feb 25, 2017.
#
# This hunspell dictionary is based on resources from Gérard Huet's
# "Héritage du Sanskrit"  site. (http://sanskrit.inria.fr/goldendict.html) 
# under the terms of the Attribution-NonCommercial 4.0 International Creative Commons license.

SET UTF-8
LANG sa-Latn

TRY ytirmvenskṣuphdlśthdhīṇjḥcogbhṭūbḍkhṁiṅñghchṭhāphuujḫiīeūḍhṛuoioṁḷṝ
KEY iī|uū|ôŏoau|æĕeai|ḍṅ|bv|ṁm̐

MAXNGRAMSUGS 10
MAXDIFF 5

REP 4
REP m ṁ
REP ṁ m
REP ś ṣ
REP ṣ ś

MAP 1
MAP lḷ

BREAK 4
BREAK _
BREAK -
BREAK ˆ-
BREAK -$
FLAG num
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 0  .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 a .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 e .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 i .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 m .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 n .
SFX 938 Y 1
SFX 938 0 s .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 t .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 u .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 tam .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 tau .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 0 mānām .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 mānān .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 mānāt .
SFX 428 Y 1
SFX 428 0 ntyā .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 īnām .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 tvayoḥ .
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 0 tena .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 0 nīyā .
SFX 350 Y 1
SFX 350 0 mānāḥ .
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 yaḥ .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 kābhyām .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 vatībhyām .
SFX 772 Y 1
SFX 772 0 ṇena .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 kena .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 0 toḥ .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 nebhyaḥ .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 bhiḥ .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 tveṣu .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 0 yānām .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 ā .
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 0 ī .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 āyām .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 ānam .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 ānau .
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 0 mānābhiḥ .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 ram .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 ran .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 rau .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 ṇābhyām .
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 0 yāni .
SFX 656 Y 1
SFX 656 0 vyāya .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 māṇayoḥ .
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 0 mānāyai .
SFX 922 Y 1
SFX 922 0 īya .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 ntīṣu .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 mānayoḥ .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 0 yamānāyām .
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 0 ānaḥ .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 vatīnām .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 ānābhiḥ .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 tībhiḥ .
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 ntīm .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 māṇataḥ .
SFX 376 Y 1
SFX 376 0 tha .
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 0 the .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 yetām .
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 0 māṇena .
SFX 497 Y 1
SFX 497 0 tvānām .
SFX 590 Y 1
SFX 590 0 itaiḥ .
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 0 yeyāthām .
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 0 ānāni .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 tāḥ .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 ṇam .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 ṇau .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 mānataḥ .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 dbhiḥ .
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 0 ntībhyaḥ .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 vadbhyām .
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 0 māṇeṣu .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 tyām .
SFX 354 Y 1
SFX 354 0 vatam .
SFX 770 Y 1
SFX 770 0 ṇaiḥ .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 aḥ .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 yamāneṣu .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 yāsu .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 tayā .
SFX 371 Y 1
SFX 371 0 yaiḥ .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 yamānebhyaḥ .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 tasya .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 yamānāyāḥ .
SFX 401 Y 1
SFX 401 0 yuḥ .
SFX 959 Y 1
SFX 959 0 āma .
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 īḥ .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 0 vatyaḥ .
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 0 yamānam .
SFX 739 Y 1
SFX 739 0 yamānau .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 tāyai .
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 0 ībhyām .
SFX 911 Y 1
SFX 911 0 māṇānām .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 0 raḥ .
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 0 āna .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 āne .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 āni .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 keṇa .
SFX 741 Y 1
SFX 741 0 yamāna .
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 0 yamāne .
SFX 546 Y 1
SFX 546 0 yevahi .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 tām .
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 0 tān .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 tāt .
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 0 itam .
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 0 itau .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 nam .
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 0 nau .
SFX 566 Y 1
SFX 566 0 ānāḥ .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 mānā .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 mānānām .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 tyai .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 0 tyau .
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 0 ānāsu .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 yethāḥ .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 smi .
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 ntībhiḥ .
SFX 541 Y 1
SFX 541 0 yemahi .
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 0 mānaḥ .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 ṇaḥ .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 ānāyai .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 ṇām .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 ṇāt .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 kām .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 kān .
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 0 kāt .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 yamānābhyaḥ .
SFX 647 Y 1
SFX 647 0 yāyām .
SFX 764 Y 1
SFX 764 0 nīyāḥ .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 ntīnām .
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 yāya .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 nābhyām .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 aiḥ .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 haḥ .
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 0 vahe .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 vahi .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 nīyaḥ .
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 0 māṇābhiḥ .
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 0 āsu .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 ībhyaḥ .
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 0 ntyaḥ .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 vatām .
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 0 ntī .
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 0 anasya .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 mahai .
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 0 mānāni .
SFX 761 Y 1
SFX 761 0 yamānaḥ .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 nīyāyai .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 ābhiḥ .
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 kam .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 kau .
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 0 vatyai .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 vatyau .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 0 tsu .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 māṇām .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 māṇān .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 māṇāt .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 nīyāni .
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 yeyātām .
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 0 iteṣu .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 vatīḥ .
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 0 mahe .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 mahi .
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 tvam .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 ayaḥ .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 ānāya .
SFX 659 Y 1
SFX 659 0 vyaiḥ .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 yamānāni .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 kābhiḥ .
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 0 ṇeṣu .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 vya .
SFX 646 Y 1
SFX 646 0 vye .
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 0 atoḥ .
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 0 māṇayā .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 kaḥ .
SFX 374 Y 1
SFX 374 0 yeṣu .
SFX 746 Y 1
SFX 746 0 yamānena .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 vatībhiḥ .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 thām .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 atam .
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 ānayoḥ .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 tva .
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 0 tve .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 māṇasya .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 vantī .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 yatām .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 māṇāyām .
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 0 mānāsu .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 nīya .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 nīye .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 dhve .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 yamānābhyām .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 dhvam .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 āya .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 vyena .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 stha .
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 0 sva .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 hai .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 mānāyām .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 nīyāsu .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 ānataḥ .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 nena .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 itaḥ .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 yamānāsu .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 ntīḥ .
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 0 anayoḥ .
SFX 790 Y 1
SFX 790 0 nīyebhyaḥ .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 yā .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 ṣu .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 nīyāyāḥ .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 vān .
SFX 736 Y 1
SFX 736 0 vyābhyaḥ .
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 yāmahai .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 naḥ .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 sya .
SFX 914 Y 1
SFX 914 0 māṇāḥ .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 tyāḥ .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 vadbhiḥ .
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 0 vyam .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 vyau .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 yamānāḥ .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 ntyām .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 eṣu .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 māṇa .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 māṇe .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 vatsu .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 tvāni .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 ṇāya .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 ānānām .
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 0 atām .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 mānāya .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 nīyayoḥ .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 0 vyayā .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 vate .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 vati .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 kāsu .
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 0 vyebhyaḥ .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 āṇām .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 nāni .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 kaiḥ .
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 0 vyāyāḥ .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 ībhiḥ .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 ntām .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 māṇāyai .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 yamānāyai .
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 0 vyasya .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 smaḥ .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 nīyāya .
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 0 ntyai .
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 0 ntyau .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 yāthām .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 tebhyaḥ .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 0 tyaḥ .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 0 tāyāḥ .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 vatoḥ .
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 0 nīyam .
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 0 nīyau .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 0 nīyataḥ .
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 yebhyaḥ .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 yamānāya .
SFX 654 Y 1
SFX 654 0 vyeṣu .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 nte .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 nti .
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 0 ntu .
SFX 645 Y 1
SFX 645 0 yāyāḥ .
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 0 kāṇām .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 īm .
SFX 942 Y 1
SFX 942 0 māṇā .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 yamānām .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 yamānān .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 yamānāt .
SFX 895 Y 1
SFX 895 0 anānām .
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 0 yadhve .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 tībhyaḥ .
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 0 vahai .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 antī .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 mānābhyaḥ .
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 0 anam .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 vadbhyaḥ .
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 0 am .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 an .
SFX 642 Y 1
SFX 642 0 at .
SFX 71 Y 1
SFX 71 0 au .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 ṇayoḥ .
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 0 naiḥ .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 yoḥ .
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 0 tvebhyaḥ .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 vyām .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 vyān .
SFX 657 Y 1
SFX 657 0 vyāt .
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 yethām .
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 0 kāya .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 dbhyaḥ .
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 0 vantaḥ .
SFX 786 Y 1
SFX 786 0 nīyānām .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 nām .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 nān .
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 nāt .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 yena .
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 0 tā .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 tī .
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 0 anebhyaḥ .
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 yedhvam .
SFX 603 Y 1
SFX 603 0 adbhyaḥ .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 vatyām .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 itāḥ .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 kayoḥ .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 0 taḥ .
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 0 eḥ .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 nayoḥ .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 nīyābhyām .
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 0 yasva .
SFX 652 Y 1
SFX 652 0 vyayoḥ .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 mānaiḥ .
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 0 māṇābhyaḥ .
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 0 itāya .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 anaiḥ .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 yāḥ .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 tayoḥ .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 tvāya .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 tāni .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 tīḥ .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 mānebhyaḥ .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 ānāyām .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 kataḥ .
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 ānā .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 mānāyāḥ .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 atsu .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 yayā .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 nāya .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 nataḥ .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 keṣu .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 thāḥ .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 vanti .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 yamānābhiḥ .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 vyataḥ .
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 0 anena .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 ṇānām .
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 0 yasya .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 vyābhyām .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 ha .
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 he .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 hi .
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 0 itayoḥ .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 yāyai .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 ita .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 ite .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 oḥ .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 yeta .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 yete .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 tataḥ .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 ānebhyaḥ .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 ābhyaḥ .
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 0 yāvahai .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 ānāyāḥ .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 mānam .
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 mānau .
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 0 tvena .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 vatyoḥ .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 tābhyām .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 ena .
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 yābhyām .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 kānām .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 ānayā .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 itataḥ .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 yābhyaḥ .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 tīṣu .
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 ṇā .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 ṇī .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 ka .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ke .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 adbhyām .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 tāsu .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 nānām .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 0 taiḥ .
SFX 667 Y 1
SFX 667 0 vyānām .
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 0 ānasya .
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 thaḥ .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 vatā .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 vatī .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 ahe .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 āḥ .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 vatyāḥ .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 ānābhyaḥ .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 kābhyaḥ .
SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422 0 tuḥ .
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 ahai .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 0 svaḥ .
